Massachusetts, session 194th, S2355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Mass General Laws Chapter 159B is amended by adding the
following definitions:
"Third-party delivery service company", a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship or
other entity qualified to do business in the commonwealth that is engaged in facilitating same-
day delivery or pickup of food and beverages through a third-party delivery service platform for
20 or more separately owned and operated covered establishments.
“Third Party Delivery Driver”, any person employed by or contracted by a third party
delivery service company, for compensation, to deliver goods over irregular routes, to and from
various points within the commonwealth, not based upon a predetermined schedule, and from
different establishments.
of 5

SECTION 2. Said chapter 159B is hereby further amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 23. (a) On the first day of each month, each third party delivery provider shall
submit to the division, in a format approved by the division, data related to each delivery
provided in the month prior to the previous month and shall include:
(i) (A) the mode of transportation for each delivery order, including but not limited to,
motorcycle, electric motorcycle, moped, electric moped, bicycle, electric bicycle, micro-
mobility, or other vehicle. If the delivery order is completed by a vehicle, they shall include
whether the vehicle is propelled by internal combustion, battery-sourced electricity or a hybrid;
(B) the latitude and longitude for the points of the delivery order origination and delivery order
termination, calculated to 0.001 decimal degrees; (C) the date and time of the origination and
termination, calculated to the nearest minute; (D) the total cost paid by the buyer for the delivery
order; (E) the total cost paid by the restaurant or retail establishment for the delivery order; (F)
the customer service fee ; (G) the delivery fee; (H) the universally-unique identifier associated
with the third party delivery driver; (I) the third party delivery driver’s city or town of residence
as appearing on the driver’s license; (J) whether there were any driver or buyer-initiated
cancellations; (K) the total time that the third party delivery driver spent on the way to pick up
the delivery order by increments of 60 seconds; (L) the total time that the third party delivery
driver spent stopped to pick up the delivery order by increments of 60 seconds; (M) the total time
that the third party delivery driver spent driving to deliver the order by increments of 60 seconds;
(N) the total time that the third party delivery driver spent delivering the order by increments of
60 seconds;
of 5

(ii) for all vehicles, third party delivery providers shall include (A) the vehicle license
plate; (B) the vehicle make, model, year and, if available, trim; (C) the vehicle identification
number; (D) the total number of minutes and miles while the vehicle was driving to pick up third
party delivery orders; (D) the total number of minutes parked while picking up third party
delivery orders; (E) the total number of minutes and miles while the vehicle was engaged in third
party deliveries; (G) the total number of minutes while parked delivering third party delivery
orders; (F) the total number of minutes and miles while the vehicle was logged into the third
party delivery provider’s digital network for purposes of accepting a delivery order; (G) the
geographic position of the vehicle while logged into the third party delivery network, provided at
intervals of not less than every 60 seconds;
(iv) for each accident or crash involving a third party delivery driver while logged into
the third party delivery vehicle’s digital network: (A) the latitude and longitude of the location of
the accident or crash, calculated to 0.001 decimal degrees; (B) the date and time of the accident
or crash, calculated to the nearest minute; and (C) the universally-unique identifier associated
with the third party delivery driver.
(b) The division shall obtain additional data from third party delivery providers for the
purposes of congestion management, which may include, but shall not be limited to: (i) the total
number of third party delivery drivers that utilized the third party delivery vehicle’s digital
network within specified geographic areas and time periods as determined by the division; (ii)
the total time spent and total miles driven by third party delivery drivers in such geographic
areas or time periods as determined by the division: (A) while engaged in driving on the way to
pick up a delivery order; (B) while picking up a delivery order from a restaurant or retail
of 5

establishment; (C) while engaged in driving to deliver a delivery order; or (D) while delivering
an order to the buyer.
The division shall promulgate regulations relative to data collection pursuant to this
subsection prior to obtaining the data.
(c) Annually, not later than June 30, the division shall post on its website, in aggregate
form, the total number of deliveries provided by all third party delivery providers that originated
in each city or town, each city or town where the deliveries originating in each city or town
terminated and the average miles and minutes of the deliveries that originated in each city or
town and terminated in each other respective city or town.
(d) For the purposes of congestion management, transportation planning, or emissions
tracking, the division may enter into confidential data-sharing agreements to share de-identified,
trip-level data received by the division pursuant to this section with the executive office of
technology services and security, the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation, the Massachusetts Port Authority, the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the department of environmental protection, a
Massachusetts regional transit authority established under section 3 of chapter 161B, a
Massachusetts regional planning agency and a Massachusetts metropolitan planning
organization. The division shall prescribe the form and content of a confidential data-sharing
agreement, the manner of transmitting the information and the information security measures
that must be employed by any entity receiving the data. Any confidential data-sharing agreement
shall specify that the information provided by the division shall be aggregated and de-identified
and may be used only for the purposes set forth in the agreement. Any data received by an entity
of 5

from the division through a confidential data-sharing agreement under this subsection shall not
be considered a public record under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 or chapter 66
and shall not be disclosed to any person or entity other than those listed or described in the
confidential data-sharing agreement; provided, however, that a state or municipal government
agency or transportation planning entity may disclose conclusions and analyses derived from the
information and data received pursuant to a confidential data-sharing agreement.
(e) A violation of the terms of a confidential data-sharing agreement by an entity listed in
subsection (d) may result in the division declining to enter into future confidential data-sharing
agreements with the violating entity and in the termination of any existing data-sharing
agreement with the entity. The division shall notify each third party delivery providers whose
data was shared in violation of the terms of a confidential data-sharing agreement of the violating
entity and what data was shared. An entity listed in subsection (d) that violates the terms of a
confidential data-sharing agreement shall delete all data received as a result of the confidential
data-sharing agreement.
of 5